Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1004 Liability of
distributees to claimants. After assets of an estate have been distributed
and subject to section 560:3-1006, an undischarged claim not barred may be
prosecuted in a proceeding against one or more distributees. No distributee shall
be liable to claimants for amounts received as exempt property, homestead or
family allowances, or for amounts in excess of the value of that person's
distribution as of the time of distribution. As between distributees, each
shall bear the cost of satisfaction of unbarred claims as if the claim had been
satisfied in the course of administration. Any distributee who shall have
failed to notify other distributees of the demand made upon that distributee by
the claimant in sufficient time to permit them to join in any proceeding in
which the claim was asserted against that distributee loses the right of
contribution against other distributees. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next